Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.42.155

Powers and activities.

(1) In addition to the taking of deposits and making of loans as provided in this chapter, a branch of an alien bank shall have the power only to carry out these other activities:

(a) Borrow funds from banks and other financial institutions;

(b) Make investments to the same extent as a state bank chartered pursuant to this title;

(c) Buy and sell foreign exchange;

(d) Receive checks, bills, drafts, acceptances, notes, bonds, coupons, and other securities for collection abroad and collect such instruments in the United States for customers abroad;

(e) Hold securities in safekeeping for, or buy and sell securities upon the order and for the risk of, customers abroad;

(f) Act as paying agent for securities issued by foreign governments or other organizations organized under foreign law and not qualified under the laws of the United States, or of any state or the District of Columbia, to do business in the United States;

(g) In order to prevent loss on debts previously contracted a branch may acquire shares in a corporation: PROVIDED, That the shares are disposed of as soon as practical but in no event later than two years from the date of acquisition;

(h) Issue letters of credit and create acceptances;

(i) Act as paying agent or trustee in connection with revenue bonds issued pursuant to chapter 39.84 RCW, in which the user is: (i) A corporation organized under the laws of a country other than the United States, or a subsidiary or affiliate owned or controlled by such a corporation; or (ii) a corporation, partnership, or other business organization, the majority of the beneficial ownership of which is owned by persons who are citizens of a country other than the United States and who are not residents of the United States, and any subsidiary or affiliate owned or controlled by such an organization; or in which the bank purchases twenty-five percent or more of the bond issue. For the purposes of chapter 39.84 RCW, such an alien bank shall be deemed to possess trust powers.

(2) In addition to the powers and activities expressly authorized by this section, a branch shall have the power to carry on such additional activities which are necessarily incidental to the activities expressly authorized by this section.

[ 2014 c 37 s 219; 1982 c 95 s 5. Formerly RCW 30.42.155.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1982 c 95: See note following RCW 30A.42.070.